Mississippi, session 2026, HB154.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The Legislature finds that: (a)  Many students enter college unprepared for the academic rigors of college and require noncredit remedial courses to attain skills and knowledge needed for regular credit coursework; (b)  There is a direct and significant link between students being prepared academically for college and success in postsecondary endeavors; (c)  Remediation lengthens the time required to obtain a degree, imposes additional costs on students and colleges, and uses student financial aid for courses that will not count toward a degree; (d)  A precollege readiness assessment program in public high schools using pre-ACT or pre-SAT assessments will provide early benchmarks for student performance on college readiness exams and inform high school guidance counselors and teachers who assist students with academic achievement, course selection and college readiness skills; (e)  A precollege readiness assessment program will provide reportable statewide data, enabling policy and program development that will benefit schools, parents and students; and (f)  Consistent use of precollege assessments will increase the number of successful student transitions into postsecondary education. SECTION 2. (1)  As used in this section: (a)  "College readiness assessment" means a test of student educational development which measures student readiness for future learning that is used by: (i)  Institutions of higher education as part of their admissions, placement and scholarship processes; and (ii)  High schools to improve college and workforce readiness. (b)  "College and career readiness" means that a student is academically ready to succeed in college-level courses or in the workforce without the need to enroll in remedial courses during the student's first year. (c) "EXPLORE" means the pre-ACT assessment designed to help students in eighth grade explore a broad range of options for their future and focus not only on high school coursework, but also on post-high school choices. (d)  "PLAN" means the pre-ACT assessment for students in tenth grade used to help a student focus attention on improved academic achievement, career preparation and planning for post-high school years. (e)  "PSAT" means the Preliminary SAT/National Merit Scholarship Qualifying Test that provides practice for the SAT Reasoning Test and gives students feedback on individual strengths and weaknesses on college readiness skills. (2)  (a)  (i)  Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, each public school that serves students in eighth grade shall administer EXPLORE to each student enrolled in eighth grade at the public school. (ii)  Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, each public school that serves students in tenth grade shall administer PLAN or the PSAT to each student enrolled in tenth grade at the public school. (b)  Funding for the college readiness assessments listed in paragraph (a) of this subsection may be paid by using State Department of Education at-risk funding. (3)  (a)  Each public school administering the college readiness assessments under this section shall use the college readiness assessments to assist students with college and workforce readiness skills, course selection in high school and improved academic achievement. (b)  Before the beginning of the 2027-2028 school year, each public school shall incorporate the results from college readiness assessments listed in subsection (2)(a) of this section into the college and career planning process for each student. (4)  Data collection shall be maintained by the State Department of Education for the purpose of: (a)  Increasing college and career readiness skills; (b)  Improving instruction; (c)  Enhancing school improvement plans; and (d)  Reducing the college remediation rates of students. (5)  The State Department of Education shall report to the House Committee on Education and the Senate Committee on Education before September 30, 2029, and each year thereafter, on the implementation and effectiveness of the College and Career Readiness Planning Program. (6)  The department shall promulgate rules to implement this section and shall monitor the use of college readiness assessments administered under this section to ensure public school compliance. SECTION 3.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.